California statutes. Fish and Game Code
(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 586, Sec. 2.   (AB 2640)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Avian Influenza Wildlife Surveillance Act [3860. - 3863.]

3860.

This chapter shall be known, and may be cited, as the Avian Influenza Wildlife Surveillance Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 708, Sec. 1.   Effective September 29, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

3861.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) Avian influenza and other emerging diseases of wildlife are a serious threat to the people of California.

(b) California is home to large populations of migratory birds and other wildlife species.

(c) California is a central part of the Pacific Flyway, and a seasonal home to species of birds that migrate to and from Asia, Central America, South America, and other regions.

(d) Surveillance of wild birds and animals across the state is a key element among efforts to prevent avian influenza and other emerging wildlife diseases from harming the people and the natural resources of the state.

(e) In the interest of public health, the state shall support a surveillance program for avian influenza in wild bird and animal populations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 708, Sec. 1.   Effective September 29, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

3862.

The Natural Resources Agency, in consultation with the department, the Department of Food and Agriculture, the State Department of Public Health, the Office of Emergency Services, and the University of California, shall develop and implement a plan for the surveillance, monitoring, sampling, diagnostic testing, and reporting of avian influenza in wild birds and animals in the state. The Natural Resources Agency shall consult with the United States Fish and Wildlife Service and the United States Department of Food and Agriculture in developing the plan.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 352, Sec. 96.   (AB 1317)   Effective September 26, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 543 of Ch. 352.)
-------------------------------------------

3863.

(a) The Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency shall formally establish the Avian Influenza Working Group to assist in the development of the plan described in Section 3862. The Avian Influenza Working Group shall utilize, as guidance for early detection, the national protocol that has been developed to guide states in developing state-specific plans, known as the Early Detection System for Asian H5N1 Highly Pathogenic Avian Influenza in Wild Migratory Birds. The Avian Influenza Working Group shall also continue, enhance, and facilitate the work already begun by the department, other state departments, and the University of California, to coordinate communication of information and response plans for highly pathogenic avian influenza
 in wild birds.

(b) The Avian Influenza Working Group shall be composed of all of the following members:

(1) The Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency, or a designee.

(2) The director, or a designee.

(3) The Secretary of Food and Agriculture, or a designee.

(4) The State Public Health Officer, or a designee.

(5) The Director of Emergency Services, or a designee.

(6) One representative appointed by the Regents of the University of California.

(7) Two representatives from a qualified research organization or other qualified nongovernmental organization appointed by the Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency.

(c) The director shall chair the Avian Influenza Working Group.

(d) A majority of the Avian Influenza Working Group shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business.

(e) The duties of the Avian Influenza Working Group shall include all of the following:

(1) Developing strategies for the detection of, and response to, the avian influenza virus in wild birds in California.

(2) Fostering communication among state and federal agencies regarding the avian influenza surveillance program.

(3) Developing strategies for public outreach and education.

(f) The Avian Influenza Working Group may consult with other public and nonprofit groups potentially affected by avian influenza in wild birds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 352, Sec. 97.   (AB 1317)   Effective September 26, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 543 of Ch. 352.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 3. MAMMALS [3950. - 4903.]



  CHAPTER 1. Game Mammals [3950. - 3961.]

3950.

(a) Game mammals are: deer (genus Odocoileus), elk (genus Cervus), prong-horned antelope (genus Antilocapra), black and brown or cinnamon bears (genus Euarctos), mountain lions (genus Felis), jackrabbits and varying hares (genus Lepus), cottontails, brush rabbits, and pygmy rabbits (genus Sylvilagus), and tree squirrels (genus Sciurus and Tamiasciurus).

(b) Nelson bighorn sheep (subspecies Ovis canadensis nelsoni) are game mammals only for the purposes of sport hunting described in subdivision (b) of Section 4902.

(c) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2024.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 12) and added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 469, Sec. 13.   (SB 856)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Operative July 1, 2024, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

3950.1.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 3950 or any other provision of this code, the mountain lion (genus Felis) shall not be listed as, or considered to be, a game mammal by the department or the commission.

(b) Section 219 does not apply to this section. Neither the commission nor the department shall adopt any regulation that conflicts with or supersedes this section.

(History: Added June 5, 1990, by initiative Proposition 117, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

3951.

The commission may authorize the taking of tule elk pursuant to Section 332. When relocating tule elk, the department shall relocate the elk in areas suitable to them in the state and shall cooperate to the maximum extent possible with federal and local agencies and private property owners in relocating tule elk in suitable areas under their jurisdiction or ownership. When property or environmental damage occurs, emphasis shall be placed on managing each tule elk herd at a biologically sound level through the use of relocation, regulated hunting, or other appropriate methods, individually or in combination, as determined by the department in accordance with the statewide elk management plan developed pursuant to Section 3952, after consulting with local landowners.

The number of tule elk in the Owens Valley shall not be permitted to increase beyond 490, or any greater number hereafter determined by the department to be the Owens Valley’s holding capacity in accordance with game management principles.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 291, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

3952.

The department shall develop a statewide elk management plan, consistent with the state’s wildlife policy as set forth in Section 1801. The statewide elk management plan shall emphasize maintaining sufficient elk populations in perpetuity, while considering all of the following:

(a) Characteristics and geographic range of each elk subspecies within the state, including Roosevelt elk, Rocky Mountain elk, and tule elk.

(b) Habitat conditions and trends within the state.

(c) Major factors affecting elk within the state, including, but not limited to, conflicts with other land uses.

(d) Management activities necessary to achieve the goals of the plan and to alleviate property damage.

(e) Identification of high priority areas for elk management.

(f)Methods for determining population viability and the minimum population level needed to sustain local herds.

(g) Description of the necessary contents for individual herd management plans prepared for high priority areas.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 291, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

3953.

(a) The Big Game Management Account is hereby established within the Fish and Game Preservation Fund.

(b) Except as provided in Section 709, all revenues from the sale of antelope, elk, deer, bear, and sheep tags, and wild pig validations, including any fundraising tags or validations, shall be deposited into the Big Game Management Account to permit separate accountability for the receipt and expenditure of these funds. Within 30 days of the date of the sale, the selling nonprofit organization shall send the department 95 percent of the total auction sale price of the tag or validations, with an itemized receipt showing the sale price and the 5-percent reduction retained by the nonprofit organization as a vendor’s fee.

(c) Funds deposited into the Big Game Management Account shall be available for expenditure upon appropriation by the Legislature to the department. These funds shall be expended solely for the purposes set forth in this section and Sections 3951 and 3952, and Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 450) of Division 1, Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 4650), and Chapter 11 (commencing with Section 4900), including acquiring land, completing projects, implementing programs to benefit antelope, elk, deer, bear, and sheep, or the use of hunting to manage wild pigs, and expanding public hunting opportunities and related public outreach. Any land acquired with funds from the Big Game Management Account shall be acquired in fee title or protected with a conservation easement and, to the extent possible, be open or provide access to the public for antelope, elk, deer, wild pig, bear, and sheep hunting. The department may also use funds from the Big Game
 Management Account to pay for administrative and enforcement costs of the programs and activities described in this section. The amount allocated from the account for administrative costs shall be limited to the reasonable costs associated with administration of the programs and activities described in this section.

(d) The department may make grants to, reimburse, or enter into contracts or other agreements, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 1571, with public and private entities, including nonprofit organizations, and federally recognized Indian tribes for the use of the funds from the Big Game Management Account to carry out the purposes of this section, including related habitat conservation projects. In acting pursuant to that authorization, the department shall consider the state’s biodiversity goals.

(e) An advisory committee, as determined by the department, that
 includes interested nonprofit organizations that have goals and objectives directly related to the management and conservation of big game species and primarily represent the interests of persons licensed pursuant to Section 3031 shall review and provide comments to the department on all proposed projects funded from the Big Game Management Account to help ensure that the requirements of this section are met. The department shall post budget information and a brief description on an internet website for all projects funded from the Big Game Management Account.

(f) A big game project authorized pursuant to this section is not subject to Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code or Article 6 (commencing with Section 999) of Chapter 6 of Division 4 of the Military and Veterans Code.

(g) The department shall maintain the internal accountability
 necessary to ensure compliance with the collection, deposit, and expenditure of funds specified in this section.

(h) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2024.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 469, Sec. 15) by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 79.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Operative July 1, 2024, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

3960.

(a) As used in this section:

(1) “Pursue” means pursue, run, or chase.

(2) “Bear” means any black bear (Ursus americanus) found in the wild in this state.

(b) It is unlawful to permit or allow any dog to pursue any big game mammal during the closed season on that mammal, to pursue any fully protected, rare, or endangered mammal at any time, to pursue any bear or bobcat at any time, or to pursue any mammal in a game refuge or ecological reserve if hunting within that refuge or ecological reserve is unlawful.

(c) The department may take any of the following actions:

(1) Capture any dog not under the reasonable control of its owner or handler, when that uncontrolled dog is pursuing, in violation of this section, any of the following mammals:

(A) A big game mammal.

(B) A bear or bobcat.

(C) A fully protected, rare, or endangered mammal.

(2) Capture or dispatch any dog inflicting injury or immediately threatening to inflict injury to any of the following mammals, under the specified conditions:

(A) A big game mammal, during the closed season on that mammal.

(B) A bear or bobcat, at any time.

(C) A fully protected, rare, or endangered mammal, at any time.

(D) A mammal in a game refuge or ecological reserve, if hunting within that refuge or ecological reserve is unlawful.

(d) No criminal or civil liability shall accrue to any department employee as a result of enforcement of this section.

(e) This section does not apply to the use of dogs to pursue bears or bobcats by federal, state, or local law enforcement officers, or their agents or employees, when carrying out official duties as required by law.

(f) If a dog captured or dispatched pursuant to this section has identification, its owner shall be notified within 72 hours after capture or
 dispatch.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 80.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

3960.2.

(a) As used in this section, the terms “bear” and “pursue” have the same meanings as defined in Section 3960.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 3960, not more than three dogs may be used to pursue bears or bobcats pursuant to a depredation permit issued by the department, if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The applicant demonstrates, in writing, that nonlethal and avoidance measures were undertaken prior to requesting the depredation permit.

(2) The applicant demonstrates, in writing,
 the specific need for the use of dogs in carrying out the depredation permit.

(3) The depredation permit authorizing the use of dogs is valid for the take of one bear or one bobcat.

(4) The depredation permit authorizing the use of dogs is valid for a period not to exceed 20 consecutive days.

(5) The depredation permit specifies the name and address of any dog handler who will be utilized in the pursuit or taking.

(6) The dog handler has the depredation permit in his or her possession at all times during the pursuit or taking.

(7) The dog handler does not pursue a bear or bobcat more than one mile off the property on which the depredation activity occurred.

(c) After any taking of a bear, the applicant is required to submit the skull to the department as described in the department’s Black Bear Management Plan. No part of any bear taken pursuant to a depredation permit may be sold, purchased, or possessed for sale, as described in Section 4758.

(d) No holder of a depredation permit may solicit or receive compensation from any person in exchange for carrying out the terms of the permit. For these purposes, “compensation” means remuneration paid in money, property, or anything else of value.

(e) The holder of a depredation permit, within 30 days of its issuance, shall report to the department detailing the use of the permit and the results of any pursuits, including information about bear or bobcat pursued and whether the bear or bobcat was or was not harmed, but not killed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 595, Sec. 3.   (SB 1221)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

3960.4.

(a) As used in this section, the terms “bear” and “pursue” have the same meanings as defined in Section 3960.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 3960, the department may authorize qualified individuals, educational institutions, governmental agencies, or nongovernmental organizations to use dogs to pursue bears or bobcats for the purpose of scientific research, provided that the research project is designed to do all of the following:

(1) Contribute to knowledge of natural wildlife ecosystems.

(2) Follow best practices and minimize disruptions in the lives and movements of bears, bobcats, and other wildlife, as well as impacts to the habitat while maintaining the applicant’s objectives.

(3) Directly or indirectly support the sustainability and survival of bear or bobcat populations and healthy ecosystems.

(4) Not include the intentional injury or killing of any bear or bobcat.

(5) Not include the intentional relocation of any bear or bobcat other than to areas suitable to them in the state. Any relocation shall comply with the requirements of Section 4190.

(c) Any
 research project authorized pursuant to subdivision (b) shall be undertaken pursuant to a memorandum of understanding between the department and the authorized research entity that addresses all of the following:

(1) Trapping and anesthetizing of the animals pursued, collection of diagnostic samples, attaching or surgically implanting monitoring or recognition devices or markings, and providing veterinary care or euthanasia, as required, for the health, safety, and humane treatment of the animals.

(2) Qualifications of onsite field supervisors necessary for carrying out authorized research procedures.

(3) Immediate reporting of any incidental mortality or injury to a bear or bobcat as a result
 of authorized research activities. Reports of any incidental mortality or injury to a bear or bobcat shall be made available to the public upon request.

(4) Filing of annual and final progress reports of research involving pursuit by dogs. Annual and final progress reports shall be made available to the public upon request.

(d) The department shall provide notice to the public of any bear or bobcat research project authorized pursuant to subdivision (b) at least 30 days prior to its initiation, and, upon request, shall make available to the public copies of the memorandum of understanding between the department and the authorized research entity required pursuant to subdivision (c).

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 595, Sec. 4.   (SB 1221)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

3960.6.

(a) As used in this section, the terms “bear” and “pursue” have the same meanings as defined in Section 3960.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 3960, the pursuit of bears or bobcats by dogs that are guarding or protecting livestock or crops on property owned, leased, or rented by the owner of the dogs, is not prohibited if the dogs are maintained with, and remain in reasonable proximity to, the livestock or crops being guarded or protected.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 595, Sec. 5.   (SB 1221)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

3961.

(a) Whenever an employee of the department is not present to carry out the provisions of Section 3960 with respect to any dog inflicting injury or immediately threatening to inflict injury to any deer, elk, or prong-horned antelope during the closed season for these mammals, any property owner, lessee, person holding a permit for the purpose of grazing livestock, or their employee, may seize or dispatch the dog if it is found on their land or premises without the permission of the person who is in immediate possession of the land. If the dog has on it any readily visible identification tag or license tag as prescribed by Section 30951 of the Food and Agricultural Code, and the dog is found in the act of immediately threatening to injure deer, elk, or prong-horned antelope, the dog may only
 be dispatched under this section if the dog has, and the owner has been notified that the dog has, previously threatened any of these species.

(b) No action, civil or criminal, shall be maintained for a dog lawfully seized or dispatched pursuant to this section.

(c) The owner of a dog shall be notified within 72 hours of the seizure or dispatching of that dog under this section if it had the identification tag or license tag which is required pursuant to Section 30951 of the Food and Agricultural Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 81.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 1.5. Exotic Game Mammals [3965. - 3965.]

3965.

(a) Exotic game mammals include wild pigs, including feral pigs and European wild boar (genus Sus) described in Section 4650.

(b) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2024.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 469, Sec. 16.   (SB 856)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Operative July 1, 2024, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Fur-Bearing Mammals [4000. - 4030.]



  ARTICLE 1. Trapping Provisions [4000. - 4012.]

4000.

The following are fur-bearing mammals: pine marten, fisher, mink, river otter, gray fox, red fox, kit fox, raccoon, beaver, badger, and muskrat.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 285, Sec. 73.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

4001.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this code or regulations adopted pursuant to this code, it is unlawful for any person to trap any fur-bearing mammal for purposes of recreation or commerce in fur. The raw fur of a fur-bearing mammal otherwise lawfully taken pursuant to this code or regulations adopted pursuant to this code may not be sold.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 216, Sec. 5.   (AB 273)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

4002.

Fur-bearing mammals may be taken only with a trap, a firearm, bow and arrow, poison under a proper permit, or with the use of dogs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 980.)
-------------------------------------------

4003.

It is unlawful to use poison to take fur-bearing mammals without a permit from the department. The department may issue such a permit upon a written application indicating the kind of poison desired to be used and the time and place of use.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

4004.

It is unlawful to do any of the following:

(a) Use a steel-jawed leghold trap, or use any trap with saw-toothed or spiked jaws.

(b) Set or maintain a trap that does not bear a number or other identifying mark as provided in this subdivision. If the trap is set pursuant to Section 4152 or 4180, it shall bear an identifying mark in a manner specified by the department. In all other cases, the trap shall bear a number or other identifying mark registered to the department, or, in the case of a federal, state, county, or city agency, bear the name of that agency. No registration fee shall be charged pursuant to this subdivision.

(c) Fail to visit and remove all
 animals from traps at least once daily. If the trapping is done pursuant to Section 4152 or 4180, the inspection and removal shall be done by the person who sets the trap, the owner of the land where the trap is set, or an agent of either.

(d) (1) Use a conibear trap that is larger than 6 inches by 6 inches, unless partially or wholly submerged in water.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), a lawfully set conibear trap that is 10 inches by 10 inches or less may be set pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 465.5 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations, unless prohibited by the department as a permit condition.

(e) When any conibear trap is set on publicly owned land or land expressly open to public use, fail to post signs at each entrance and exit to the property indicating the presence
 of conibear traps and at least four additional signs within a radius of 50 feet of each trap, one in each cardinal direction, with lettering that is a minimum of three inches high stating: “Danger! Traps Set For Wildlife. Keep Out.” Signs required to be posted by this subdivision shall be maintained and checked daily.

(f) Kill any trapped mammal in accordance with this section by intentional drowning, injection with any chemical not sold for the purpose of euthanizing animals, or thoracic compression, commonly known as chest crushing. This subdivision does not apply to the use of a lawfully set conibear trap that is set partially or wholly submerged in water to trap beaver or muskrat, or the use of a lawfully set colony trap that is set in water to trap muskrat.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 82.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

4005.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in this section, every person who traps fur-bearing mammals or nongame mammals, designated by the commission, shall procure a trapping license. Raw fur of fur-bearing and nongame mammals may not be sold. For purposes of this article, “raw fur” means any fur, pelt, or skin that has not been tanned or cured, except that salt-cured or sun-cured pelts are raw furs.

(b) The department shall develop standards that are necessary to ensure the competence and proficiency of applicants for a trapping license. A person shall not be issued a license until the person has passed a test of their knowledge and skill in
 this field.

(c) Persons trapping mammals in accordance with Section 4152 or 4180 are not required to procure a trapping license except when providing trapping services for profit.

(d) No raw furs taken by persons providing trapping services for profit may be sold.

(e) The license requirement imposed by this section does not apply to any of the following:

(1) Officers or employees of federal, county, or city agencies or the department, when acting in their official capacities, or officers or employees of the Department of Food and Agriculture when acting pursuant to the Food and Agricultural Code pertaining to pests or pursuant to Article 6 (commencing with
 Section 6021) of Chapter 9 of Part 1 of Division 4 of the Food and Agricultural Code.

(2) Structural pest control operators licensed pursuant to Chapter 14 (commencing with Section 8500) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code, when trapping rats, mice, voles, moles, or gophers.

(3) Persons and businesses licensed or certified by the Department of Pesticide Regulation pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 11701) and Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 12201) of Division 6 of, and Chapter 3.6, (commencing with Section 14151) of Division 7 of, the Food and Agricultural Code, when trapping rats, mice, voles, moles, or gophers.

(f) Except for species that are listed pursuant to Chapter 1.5 (commencing
 with Section 2050) of Division 3 or Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 4700), nothing in this code or regulations adopted pursuant thereto shall prevent or prohibit a person from trapping any of the following animals:

(1) Gophers.

(2) House mice.

(3) Moles.

(4) Rats.

(5) Voles.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 216, Sec. 7.   (AB 273)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

4006.

(a) A trapping license shall be issued as follows:

(1) To any resident of this state over the age of 16 years upon payment of a base fee of forty-five dollars ($45), as adjusted under Section 713.

(2) To any resident of this state under the age of 16 years upon payment of a base fee of fifteen dollars ($15), as adjusted under Section 713.

(3) To any person not a resident of this state upon payment of a base fee of two hundred twenty-five dollars ($225), as adjusted under Section 713.

(b) A
 license shall not be issued to a nonresident if the state in which he or she resides does not provide for issuance of a nonresident trapping license to California residents. Also, a nonresident issued a license under this subdivision may take only those species, and may take or possess only that quantity of a species that a resident of California may take or possess under a nonresident trapping license or permit in the state of residence of that nonresident.

(c) The commission shall adjust the amount of the fees specified in subdivision (a), as necessary, to fully recover, but not exceed, all reasonable administrative and implementation costs of the department and the commission relating to those licenses.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 565, Sec. 17.   (SB 1148)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

4007.

A trapping license authorizes the person to whom it is issued to take fur-bearing mammals and nongame mammals for a term of one year from July 1st, or if issued after the beginning of the term, for the remainder
 of the term.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 216, Sec. 8.   (AB 273)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

4008.

No trapping license shall be issued to any applicant within one year following the expiration of any trapping license previously issued to such applicant unless the applicant has submitted to the department a sworn statement showing the number of each kind of fur-bearing mammals and nongame mammals taken under the previous license.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 216, Sec. 9.   (AB 273)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

4009.

It is unlawful to remove or disturb the trap of any licensee while the trap is being used by the licensee on public land or on land where the licensee has permission to trap. This section does not apply to any employee of the department while engaged in the performance of official duties.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1048, Sec. 2.   Effective September 26, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

4009.5.

The commission may adopt regulations as it determines to be necessary to regulate the taking of fur-bearing mammals or nongame mammals taken under a trapping license.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 216, Sec. 10.   (AB 273)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

4010.

The provisions of this chapter do not apply to, or prohibit the propagation of, fur-bearing mammals which are confined in accordance with the regulations of the commission.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

4011.

(a) Fur-bearing mammals, game mammals, and nongame mammals, when involved in dangerous disease outbreaks, may be taken by duly constituted officials of any of the following:

(1) The United States Department of Agriculture.

(2) The United States Department of the Interior.

(3) The United States Department of Health and Human Services.

(4) The Department of Food and Agriculture.

(5) The State Department of Public Health.

(6) The department.

(b) A county official may take fur-bearing mammals, game mammals, and nongame mammals pursuant to this section, upon the prior approval of the director or his or her designee and in a manner approved by the director or his or her designee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 294, Sec. 12.   (AB 1442)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

4012.

It is unlawful to take any red fox for profitmaking purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 285, Sec. 76.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Beaver Restoration Program [4030. - 4030.]

4030.

(a) Subject to an appropriation by the Legislature for these purposes, there shall be in the department a program to promote beaver restoration across California by advising on policies and guidelines relating to beavers, coordinating restoration efforts, integrating methods to avoid or alleviate human-beaver conflict, relocating beavers into watersheds, and consulting with beaver restoration program partners.

(b) As used in this article, “beaver restoration program partners” means
 local, state, and federal agencies, nonprofit organizations, federally recognized tribes, nonfederally recognized California Native American tribes included on the contact list maintained by the Native American Heritage Commission, academic programs, and other entities.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 705, Sec. 2.   (AB 2196)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Nongame Mammals and Depredators [4150. - 4190.]



  ARTICLE 1. Nongame Mammals [4150. - 4158.]

4150.

(a) A mammal occurring naturally in California that is not a game mammal, exotic game mammal, fully protected mammal, or fur-bearing mammal is a nongame mammal. A nongame mammal may not be taken or possessed except as provided in this code or in accordance with regulations adopted by the commission.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of this code or regulations adopted pursuant to this code, it is unlawful for any person to trap any nongame mammal for purposes of recreation or commerce in fur. The raw fur of a nongame mammal otherwise lawfully taken pursuant to this code or regulations adopted pursuant to this code shall not be sold. For purposes of this
 subdivision,
 “raw fur” has the same meaning as defined in Section 4005. 

(c) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2024.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 17) and added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 469, Sec. 18.   (SB 856)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Operative July 1, 2024, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

4151.

Any house cat (Felis domesticus) found within the limits of any fish and game refuge is a nongame mammal, unless it is in the residence of its owner or upon the grounds of the owner adjacent to such residence.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1470.)
-------------------------------------------

4152.

(a) Except as provided in Section 4005, nongame mammals and black-tailed jackrabbits, muskrats, subspecies of red fox that are not the native Sierra Nevada red fox (Vulpes vulpes necator), and red fox squirrels that are found to be injuring growing crops or other property may be taken at any time or in any manner in accordance with this code and regulations adopted pursuant to this code by the owner or tenant of the premises or employees and agents in immediate possession of written permission from the owner or tenant thereof. They may also be taken by officers or employees of the Department of Food and Agriculture or by federal, county, or city officers or employees when acting in their official capacities pursuant to the Food and Agricultural Code pertaining to pests, or pursuant to
 Article 6 (commencing with Section 6021) of Chapter 9 of Part 1 of Division 4 of the Food and Agricultural Code. Persons taking mammals in accordance with this section are exempt from Section 3007, except when providing trapping services for a fee. Raw furs, as defined in Section 4005, that are taken under this section, shall not be sold.

(b) Traps used pursuant to this section shall be inspected and all animals in the traps shall be removed at least once daily. The inspection and removal shall be done by the person who sets the trap or the owner of the land where the trap is set or an agent of either.

(c) This section does not apply to bobcats.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 766, Sec. 1.   (AB 1254)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

4153.

(a) The department may enter into cooperative agreements with any agency of the state or the United States for the purpose of controlling harmful nongame mammals.

(b) The department may take any mammal that, in its opinion, is unduly preying upon any bird, mammal, or fish.

(c) This section does not apply to bobcats.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 766, Sec. 2.   (AB 1254)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

4154.

(a) The department may enter into cooperative contracts with the United States Fish and Wildlife Service in the Department of the Interior for the purpose of controlling or eradicating any nongame mammal, and may expend any money made available to the department for that purpose.

(b) This section does not apply to bobcats.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 83.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

4155.

(a) Beginning January 1, 2014, it shall be unlawful to trap a bobcat, or attempt to do so, or to sell or export a bobcat taken in the area surrounding Joshua Tree National Park, defined as follows: East and South of State Highway 62 from the intersection of Interstate 10 to the intersection of State Highway 177; West of State Highway 177 from the intersection of State Highway 62 to the intersection with Interstate 10; North of Interstate 10 from State Highway 177 to State Highway 62.

(b) (1) Through the commission’s next regularly scheduled mammal hunting and trapping rulemaking process occurring after January 1, 2014, the commission shall amend its regulations to prohibit the trapping of bobcats
 adjacent to the boundaries of each national or state park and national monument or wildlife refuge in which bobcat trapping is prohibited.

(2) Commencing January 1, 2016, the commission shall consider whether to prohibit bobcat trapping within, and adjacent to, preserves, state conservancies, and any additional public or private conservation areas identified to the commission by the public as warranting protection. The commission, as necessary, shall amend its regulations through its next subsequently scheduled mammal hunting and trapping rulemaking process to prohibit bobcat trapping in any area determined by the commission to warrant protection.

(3) The commission shall delineate the boundaries of an area in which bobcat trapping is prohibited pursuant to paragraph (1) or (2) using readily identifiable features, such as highways or other major roads, such as those delineated for
 Joshua Tree National Park in subdivision (a).

(c) The prohibition on the trapping of bobcats in the areas designated pursuant to subdivisions (a) and (b) shall not apply to the taking of a bobcat by an employee of the department acting in an official capacity, to a taking in accordance with the conditions of a scientific, educational, or propagation permit pursuant to Section 1002 by the holder of that permit, or to the lawful taking of a bobcat found to be injuring crops or other property, pursuant to Section 4152, another provision of this code, or a regulation adopted pursuant to this code.

(d) Notwithstanding Section 2016 or any other provision of this code, on and after January 1, 2014, it shall be unlawful to trap a bobcat, or attempt to do so, on private land not belonging to the trapper without the express written consent of the owner of that property. The placing or
 possession of a trap or the possession of a bobcat on land is prima facie evidence of a violation of this subdivision.

(e) Consistent with the requirements of subdivision (c) of Section 4006, the commission shall set trapping license fees and associated fees, including, but not limited to, shipping tags required pursuant to Section 479 of Chapter 6 of Subdivision 2 of Division 1 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations, for the 2014–15 season, and any subsequent seasons in which bobcat trapping is allowed, at the levels necessary to fully recover all reasonable administrative and implementation costs of the department and the commission associated with the trapping of bobcats in the state, including, but not limited to, enforcement costs.
